Alaska, session 34, HB383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 05 to read: 06 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature that the building 07 management specialist positions established in AS 44.27.030 be part of a career ladder 08 established in the Department of Education and Early Development with multiple grades and 09 position levels to retain qualified professionals who are dedicated to facility management. 10 * Sec. 2. AS 44.27 is amended by adding a new section to article 1 to read: 11 Sec. 44.27.030. Building management specialists. Three positions dedicated 12 to facility management are established in the Department of Education and Early 13 Development. The positions are responsible for supporting school districts with 14 preventive maintenance, facility management, and capital improvements. The support 01 provided by the building management specialists must include training, technical 02 assistance, and on-site assistance. 03 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.